Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1257
County board; contracts authorized.

The county board may contract with any person, firm, association, or corporation to carry out the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 5.